Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 3. Jurisdiction and Venue.
§ 16.1-242.
Retention of jurisdiction.

When jurisdiction has been obtained by the court in the case of any child, such jurisdiction, which includes the authority to suspend, reduce, modify, or dismiss the disposition of any juvenile adjudication, may be retained by the court until such person becomes 21 years of age, except when the person is in the custody of the Department or when jurisdiction is divested under the provisions of §

16.1-244

. In any event, when such person reaches the age of 21 and a prosecution has not been commenced against him, he shall be proceeded against as an adult, even if he was a juvenile when the offense was committed.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-159; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 740; 1992, c. 509; 2018, c. 656.

Cross references.

As to the Court-Appointed Special Advocate Program, see §

9.1-151

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts
2018, c. 656, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 656 inserted “which includes the authority to suspend, reduce, modify, or dismiss the disposition of any juvenile adjudication” in the first sentence and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For discussion of retrial of infant as adult, see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 142 (1969).

For comment, “The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia,” see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 797 (1992).

§ 16.1-242.1.
Retention of jurisdiction; appeals involving children in foster care.

Upon appeal to the circuit court of any case involving a child placed in foster care and in any appeal to the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court of Virginia, the juvenile court shall retain jurisdiction to continue to hear petitions filed pursuant to §§

16.1-282

and

16.1-282.1

. Orders of the juvenile court in such cases shall continue to be reviewed and enforced by the juvenile court until the circuit court, Court of Appeals or Supreme Court rules otherwise.

History.

1998, c. 550.

§ 16.1-243.
Venue.

Original venue:

Cases involving children, other than support or where protective order issued: Proceedings with respect to children under this law, except support proceedings as provided in subdivision 2 or family abuse proceedings as provided in subdivision 3, shall:

Delinquency: If delinquency is alleged, be commenced in the city or county where the acts constituting the alleged delinquency occurred or they may, with the written consent of the child and the attorney for the Commonwealth for both jurisdictions, be commenced in the city or county where the child resides;

Custody or visitation: In cases involving custody or visitation, be commenced in the court of the city or county which, in order of priority, (i) is the home of the child at the time of the filing of the petition, or had been the home of the child within six months before the filing of the petition and the child is absent from the city or county because of his removal or retention by a person claiming his custody or for other reasons, and a parent or person acting as a parent continues to live in the city or county; (ii) has significant connection with the child and in which there is substantial evidence concerning the child’s present or future care, protection, training and personal relationships; (iii) is where the child is physically present and the child has been abandoned or it is necessary in an emergency to protect the child because he has been subjected to or threatened with mistreatment or abuse or is otherwise neglected or dependent; or (iv) it is in the best interest of the child for the court to assume jurisdiction as no other city or county is an appropriate venue under the preceding provisions of this subdivision;

Adoption: In parental placement adoption consent hearings pursuant to §§

16.1-241

,

63.2-1233

, and

63.2-1237

, be commenced in any city or county, provided, however, that diligent efforts shall first be made to commence such hearings (i) in the city or county where the child to be adopted was born, (ii) in the city or county where the birth parent(s) reside, or (iii) in the city or county where the prospective adoptive parent(s) reside. In cases in which a hearing is commenced in a city or county other than one described in clause (i), (ii), or (iii), the petitioner shall certify in writing to the court that diligent efforts to commence a hearing in such city or county have been made but have proven ineffective;

Abuse and neglect: In cases involving an allegedly abused or neglected child, be commenced (i) in the city or county where the child resides, (ii) in the city or county where the child is present when the proceedings are commenced, or (iii) in the city or county where the alleged abuse or neglect occurred; and

All other cases: In all other proceedings, be commenced in the city or county where the child resides or in the city or county where the child is present when the proceedings are commenced.

Support: Proceedings that involve child or spousal support or child and spousal support, exclusive of proceedings arising under Chapter 5 (§

20-61

et seq.) of Title 20, shall be commenced in the city or county where either party resides or in the city or county where the respondent is present when the proceeding commences.

Family abuse: Proceedings in which an order of protection is sought as a result of family abuse shall be commenced where (i) either party has his or her principal residence (ii) the abuse occurred or (iii) a protective order was issued if at the time the proceeding is commenced the order is in effect to protect the petitioner or a family or household member of the petitioner.

Transfer of venue:

Generally: Except in custody, visitation and support cases, if the child resides in a city or county of the Commonwealth and the proceeding is commenced in a court of another city or county, that court may at any time, on its own motion or a motion of a party for good cause shown, transfer the proceeding to the city or county of the child’s residence for such further action or proceedings as the court receiving the transfer may deem proper. However, such transfer may occur in delinquency proceedings only after adjudication, which shall include, for the purposes of this section, a finding of facts sufficient to justify a finding of delinquency.

Custody and visitation: In custody and visitation cases, if venue lies in one of several cities or counties, the court in which the motion for transfer is made shall determine which such city or county is the most appropriate venue unless the parties mutually agree to the selection of venue. In the consideration of the motion, the best interests of the child shall determine the most appropriate forum.

Support: In support proceedings, exclusive of proceedings arising under Chapter 5 (§

20-61

et seq.) of Title 20, if the respondent resides in a city or county in the Commonwealth and the proceeding is commenced in a court of another city or county, that court may, at any time on its own motion or a motion of a party for good cause shown or by agreement of the parties, transfer the proceeding to the city or county of the respondent’s residence for such further action or proceedings as the court receiving the transfer may deem proper. For the purposes of determining venue of cases involving support, the respondent’s residence shall include any city or county in which the respondent has resided within the last six months prior to the commencement of the proceeding or in which the respondent is residing at the time that the motion for transfer of venue is made. If venue is transferable to one of several cities or counties, the court in which the motion for transfer is made shall determine which such city or county is the most appropriate venue unless the parties mutually agree to the selection of such venue.When the support proceeding is a companion case to a child custody or visitation proceeding, the provisions governing venue in the proceeding involving the child’s custody or visitation shall govern.

Subsequent transfers: Any court receiving a transferred proceeding as provided in this section may in its discretion transfer such proceeding to a court in an appropriate venue for good cause shown based either upon changes in circumstances or mistakes of fact or upon agreement of the parties. In any transfer of venue in cases involving children, the best interests of the child shall be considered in deciding if and to which court a transfer of venue would be appropriate.

Enforcement of orders for support, maintenance and custody: Any juvenile and domestic relations district court to which a suit is transferred for enforcement of orders pertaining to support, maintenance, care or custody pursuant to §

20-79 (c)

may transfer the case as provided in this section.

Records: Originals of all legal and social records pertaining to the case shall accompany the transfer of venue. Records imaged from the original documents shall be considered original documents for purposes of the transfer of venue. The transferor court may, in its discretion, retain copies as it deems appropriate.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-160; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1985, c. 367; 1987, cc. 598, 608, 620; 1989, c. 545; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1996, c. 866; 2000, c. 830; 2010, cc. 717, 760; 2012, c. 424; 2018, c. 17; 2019, cc. 126, 235.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 830 substituted “63.1-219.40 and 63.1-219.44” for “and 63.1-220.3” in subdivision A 1 c.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 717 and 760 are identical, and in subsection C, inserted the second sentence and deleted “such” preceding “copies” in the last sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 424 rewrote subdivision A 1 c, which formerly read “Adoption: In parental placement adoption consent hearings pursuant to §§

16.1-241

,

63.2-1233

and

63.2-1237

, be commenced (i) in the city or county where the child to be adopted was born, (ii) in the city or county where the birth parent(s) reside, or (iii) in the city or county where the prospective adoptive parent(s) reside” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 17, in subdivision A 1 c, in the second sentence, substituted “clause (i), (ii), or (iii)” for “clauses (i) through (iii)”; inserted subdivision A 1 d and redesignated former subdivision A 1 d as A 1 e; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 126 and 235 are identical, and substituted “may occur in delinquency proceedings only after adjudication, which shall include, for the purposes of this section, a finding of facts sufficient to justify a finding of delinquency” for “may occur only after adjudication in delinquency proceedings” in subdivision B 1.

Law Review.

For 1987 survey of Virginia law as to children, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 789 (1987).

For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

§ 16.1-244.
Concurrent jurisdiction; exceptions.

Nothing contained in this law shall deprive any other court of the concurrent jurisdiction to determine the custody of children upon a writ of habeas corpus under the law, or to determine the custody, guardianship, visitation or support of children when such custody, guardianship, visitation or support is incidental to the determination of causes pending in such courts, nor deprive a circuit court of jurisdiction to determine spousal support in a suit for separate maintenance. However, when a suit for divorce has been filed in a circuit court, in which the custody, guardianship, visitation or support of children of the parties or spousal support is raised by the pleadings and a hearing, including a pendente lite hearing, is set by the circuit court on any such issue for a date certain or on a motions docket to be heard within 21 days of the filing, the juvenile and domestic relations district courts shall be divested of the right to enter any further decrees or orders to determine custody, guardianship, visitation or support when raised for such hearing and such matters shall be determined by the circuit court unless both parties agreed to a referral to the juvenile court. In any case in which the jurisdiction of the juvenile and domestic relations district court has been divested pursuant to this section and no final support order has been entered, any award for child support or spousal support in the circuit court shall be retroactive to the date on which the proceeding was commenced by the filing of the action in the juvenile and domestic relations district court, provided that the petitioner exercised due diligence in the service of the respondent. Nothing in this section shall deprive a circuit court of the authority to refer any such case to a commissioner for a hearing or shall deprive the juvenile and domestic relations district courts of the jurisdiction to enforce its valid orders prior to the entry of a conflicting order of any circuit court for any period during which the order was in effect or to temporarily place a child in the custody of any person when that child has been adjudicated abused, neglected, in need of services or delinquent subsequent to the order of any circuit court.

Jurisdiction of cases involving violations of federal law by a child shall be concurrent and shall be assumed only if waived by the federal court or the United States attorney.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-161; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 740; 1984, cc. 657, 669; 1985, c. 183; 1987, c. 36; 1989, c. 509; 1990, c. 600; 2000, c. 781; 2003, c. 129; 2022, c. 527.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 781, in subsection A, inserted “to determine custody, guardianship, visitation or support when raised for such hearing and” near the end of the second sentence and deleted the former third sentence, which read: “Upon a showing of need to continue any preliminary protective order issued by the juvenile and domestic relations district court, the circuit court shall grant a hearing to the parties as a preferential matter on the court docket.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 129, in the second sentence, inserted “including a pendente lite hearing” following “hearing,” inserted “or on a motions docket” following “certain,” and substituted “21” for “twenty-one.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 527, inserted the third sentence of subsection A.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1411 (1970).

For comment, “The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia,” see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony, § 69; 9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 16.

§ 16.1-245.
Transfer from other courts.

If, during the pendency of a proceeding in any other court, it is ascertained for the first time that exclusive jurisdiction lies within the juvenile and domestic relations district court, such court shall forthwith transfer the case, together with all papers, documents and evidence connected therewith, to the juvenile and domestic relations district court of the city or county having jurisdiction. The court making the transfer shall determine who is to have custody of the child pending action by the juvenile and domestic relations district court pursuant to §

16.1-247

.
If, during the pendency of a proceeding in the juvenile and domestic relations district court, it is ascertained for the first time that exclusive jurisdiction lies in the general district or circuit court, the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall likewise transfer the case to the appropriate court.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-175; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1992, c. 496.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law and procedure for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1970).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 8; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, §§ 13, 84.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Transferee court lacked subject matter jurisdiction. —

Circuit Court for the City of Norfolk did not have subject matter jurisdiction to consider the parties’ motions to amend a husband’s child and spousal support obligations upon a transfer from the Norfolk Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court since: (1) the circuit court did not have concurrent jurisdiction to amend the support orders; (2) §

16.1-245

allowed the district court to transfer a case to the circuit court if the circuit court had exclusive jurisdiction, but the circuit court did not have exclusive jurisdiction; (3) the circuit court only had appellate jurisdiction over a Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court order under subsections A and J of §

16.1-296

; (4) there was no authority to transfer a case from a lower court to a circuit court pendente lite; and (5) the Virginia Constitution and the statutes enacted pursuant to it were the sources of the circuit court’s subject matter jurisdiction. Cunningham v. Cunningham, 86 Va. Cir. 202, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 10 (Norfolk Jan. 24, 2013).

§ 16.1-245.1.
Medical evidence admissible in juvenile and domestic relations district court.

In any civil case heard in a juvenile and domestic relations district court involving allegations of child abuse or neglect or family abuse, any party may present evidence, by a report from the treating or examining health care provider as defined in §

8.01-581.1

or the records of a hospital, medical facility or laboratory at which the treatment, examination or laboratory analysis was performed, or both, as to the extent, nature, and treatment of any physical condition or injury suffered by a person and the examination of the person or the result of the laboratory analysis.

A medical report shall be admitted if the party intending to present such evidence at trial or hearing gives the opposing party or parties a copy of the evidence and written notice of intention to present it at least 10 days, or in the case of a preliminary removal hearing under §

16.1-252

or in preliminary protective order hearings under §

16.1-253

or

16.1-253.1

at least 24 hours, prior to the trial or hearing and if attached to such evidence is a sworn statement of the treating or examining health care provider or laboratory analyst who made the report that (i) the information contained therein is true, accurate, and fully describes the nature and extent of the physical condition or injury and (ii) the patient named therein was the person treated or examined by such health care provider; or, in the case of a laboratory analysis, that the information contained therein is true and accurate.

A hospital or other medical facility record shall be admitted if attached to it is a sworn statement of the custodian thereof that the same is a true and accurate copy of the record of such hospital or other medical facility. If thereafter a party summons the health care provider or custodian making such statement to testify in proper person or by deposition taken de bene esse, the court shall determine which party shall pay the fees and costs for such appearance or depositions, or may apportion the same among the parties in such proportion as the ends of justice may require. If such health care provider or custodian is not subject to subpoena for cross-examination in court or by a deposition de bene esse, then the court shall allow a reasonable opportunity for the party seeking the subpoena for such health care provider or custodian to obtain his testimony as the ends of justice may require.

History.

1990, c. 560; 1996, c. 866; 2000, c. 163; 2019, c. 716.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 163, in the first paragraph, deleted “or” following “records of a hospital” and following “at which treatment,” inserted “or laboratory” following “medical facility,” inserted “or laboratory analysis” preceding “was performed,” and added “or the result of the laboratory analysis”; and in the second paragraph, inserted “or laboratory analyst” following “health care provider” and added “or, in the case of a laboratory analysis, that the information contained therein is true and accurate.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 716, in the second paragraph, inserted “in preliminary protective order hearings under §

16.1-253

or” and made stylistic changes.